Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.536

Broadband office—Goals.

It is a goal of the state of Washington that:

(1) By 2024, all Washington businesses and residences have access to high-speed broadband that provides minimum download speeds of at least twenty-five megabits per second and minimum upload speeds of at least three megabits per second;

(2) By 2026, all Washington communities have access to at least one gigabit per second symmetrical broadband service at anchor institutions like schools, hospitals, libraries, and government buildings; and

(3) By 2028, all Washington businesses and residences have access to at least one provider of broadband with download speeds of at least one hundred fifty megabits per second and upload speeds of at least one hundred fifty megabits per second.

[ 2019 c 365 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 365: See note following RCW 43.330.532.